test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-aqilw_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ailõ: # Verb 51 'eng /est joosta/fin' - full paradigm
     ailõ+V+Inf: aʼilõ
     ailõ+V+Ger: aʼilõs
     ailõ+V+Sup: aʼilõm
     ailõ+V+Sup+Ine: aʼilõmõs
     ailõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼilõmõst
     ailõ+V+Sup+Tra: aʼilõmõks
     ailõ+V+Sup+Abe: aʼilõmõt
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼilõb
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼilõt
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼilõbõd
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼiliz
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
     ailõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
     ailõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼil
     ailõ+V+Cond+Sg3: aʼilõks
     ailõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aʼil
     ailõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼil
     ailõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aʼilõgid
     ailõ+V+Jus+Sg3: aʼilõg
     ailõ+V+Quo+Sg3: aʼiliji
     ailõ+V+ActPrfPrc: aʼilõn
     ailõ+V+PssPrfPrc: aʼildõd
